Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5748.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
The Registry of Motor Vehicles shall establish a program for the issuance of special
motor vehicle license plates to individuals who are autistic or neurodivergent, or to parents or
legal guardians of children who are autistic or neurodivergent.
SECTION 2.
Eligibility for such special license plates shall be limited to owners or lessees of private
passenger motor vehicles registered in the Commonwealth. An application for such a plate must
include a certification from a licensed physician, psychologist, or other qualified medical
professional, attesting that the applicant, or their child, has been diagnosed as autistic or
neurodivergent.
of 2

SECTION 3.
The design of the special license plate shall include distinctive features or markings
identifying the vehicle as associated with an autistic or neurodivergent individual or their family.
The Registry shall consult with representatives of the autistic and neurodivergent community in
the development of the plate’s design. The plate shall be of the same size and general shape as
standard license plates.
SECTION 4.
The fee for the issuance of a special license plate under this act shall be equal to the
standard registration fee for passenger vehicles. The license plate shall be valid for a biennial
period and may be renewed upon payment of the applicable renewal fee.
SECTION 5.
The Registrar may promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of
this act, including but not limited to procedures for application, verification of eligibility, and
renewal.
SECTION 6.
This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2